Missouri, session 2026, HB1980.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 190, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 190.174, to read as follows:
190.174. Any person licensed under sections 190.001 to 190.245 shall be
2 considered a health care professional for purposes of section 537.035, and any quality
3 improvement or quality assurance activity required under sections 190.001 to 190.245
4 shall be considered an activity of a peer review committee for purposes of section
5 537.035.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.